QUESTION 1
A security administrator suspects there may be unnecessary services running on a server. Which of the
following tools will the administrator MOST likely use to confirm the suspicions?
A. Nmap
B. Wireshark
C. Autopsy
D. DNSEnum
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 2
A network administrator has been asked to design a solution to improve a company's security posture The
administrator is given the following, requirements?
* The solution must be inline in the network
* The solution must be able to block known malicious traffic
* The solution must be able to stop network-based attacks Which of the following should the network
administrator implement to BEST meet these requirements?
A. HIDS
B. NIDS
C. HIPS
D. NIPS
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 3
A retail executive recently accepted a job with a major competitor. The following week, a security analyst
reviews the security logs and identifies successful logon attempts to access the departed executive's accounts.
Which of the following security practices would have addressed the issue?
A. A non-disclosure agreement
B. Least privilege
C. An acceptable use policy
D. Offboarding
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 4
A network engineer needs to build a solution that will allow guests at the company's headquarters to access the
Internet via WiFi. This solution should not allow access to the internal corporate network, but it should require
guests to sign off on the acceptable use policy before accessing the Internet. Which of the following should the
engineer employ to meet these requirements?
A. Implement open PSK on the APs
B. Deploy a WAF
C. Configure WIPS on the APs
D. Install a captive portal
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 5
Which of the following will provide the BEST physical security countermeasures to stop intruders? (Select
TWO.)
A. Alarms
B. Signage
C. Lighting
D. Mantraps
E. Fencing
F. Sensors
Correct Answer: DE


QUESTION 6
Under GDPR, which of the following is MOST responsible for the protection of privacy and website user rights?
A. The data protection officer
B. The data processor
C. The data owner
D. The data controller
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 7
An analyst needs to identify the applications a user was running and the files that were open before the user's
computer was shut off by holding down the power button. Which of the following would MOST likely contain that
information?
A. NGFW
B. Pagefile
C. NetFlow
D. RAM
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 8
A user enters a password to log in to a workstation and is then prompted to enter an authentication code.
Which of the following MFA factors or attributes are being utilized in the authentication process? (Select TWO).
A. Something you know
B. Something you have
C. Somewhere you are
D. Someone you are
E. Something you are
F. Something you can do
Correct Answer: AB


QUESTION 9
A network engineer has been asked to investigate why several wireless barcode scanners and wireless
computers in a warehouse have intermittent connectivity to the shipping server. The barcode scanners and
computers are all on forklift trucks and move around the warehouse during their regular use. Which of the
following should the engineer do to determine the issue? (Choose two.)
A. Perform a site survey
B. Deploy an FTK Imager
C. Create a heat map
D. Scan for rogue access points
E. Upgrade the security protocols
F. Install a captive portal
Correct Answer: AC


QUESTION 10
A security analyst is using a recently released security advisory to review historical logs, looking for the specific
activity that was outlined in the advisory. Which of the following is the analyst doing?
A. A packet capture
B. A user behavior analysis
C. Threat hunting
D. Credentialed vulnerability scanning
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 11
An organization's help desk is flooded with phone calls from users stating they can no longer access certain
websites. The help desk escalates the issue to the security team, as these websites were accessible the
previous day. The security analysts run the following command: ipconfig /flushdns, but the issue persists.
Finally, an analyst changes the DNS server for an impacted machine, and the issue goes away. Which of the
following attacks MOST likely occurred on the original DNS server?
A. DNS cache poisoning
B. Domain hijacking
C. Distributed denial-of-service
D. DNS tunneling
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 12
In which of the following risk management strategies would cybersecurity insurance be used?
A. Transference
B. Avoidance
C. Acceptance
D. Mitigation
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 13
The Chief Security Officer (CSO) at a major hospital wants to implement SSO to help improve in the
environment patient data, particularly at shared terminals. The Chief Risk Officer (CRO) is concerned that
training and guidance have been provided to frontline staff, and a risk analysis has not been performed. Which
of the following is the MOST likely cause of the CRO's concerns?
A. SSO would simplify username and password management, making it easier for hackers to pass guess
accounts.
B. SSO would reduce password fatigue, but staff would still need to remember more complex passwords.
C. SSO would reduce the password complexity for frontline staff.
D. SSO would reduce the resilience and availability of system if the provider goes offline.
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 14
A security engineer is reviewing log files after a third discovered usernames and passwords for the
organization's accounts. The engineer sees there was a change in the IP address for a vendor website one
earlier. This change lasted eight hours. Which of the following attacks was MOST likely used?
A. Man-in- the middle
B. Spear-phishing
C. Evil twin
D. DNS poisoning
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 15
A user received an SMS on a mobile phone that asked for bankdetails. Which of the following socialengineering techniques was used in this case?
A. SPIM
B. Vishing
C. Spear phishing
D. Smishing
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 16
A consultant is configuring a vulnerability scanner for a large, global organization in multiple countries. The
consultant will be using a service account to scan systems with administrative privileges on a weekly basis, but
there is a concern that hackers could gain access to the account and pivot through the global network. Which
of the following would be BEST to help mitigate this concern?
A. Create consultant accounts for each region, each configured with push MFA notifications.
B. Create one global administrator account and enforce Kerberos authentication
C. Create different accounts for each region. limit their logon times, and alert on risky logins
D. Create a guest account for each region. remember the last ten passwords, and block password reuse
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 17
A Chief Security Office's (CSO's) key priorities are to improve preparation, response, and recovery practices to
minimize system downtime and enhance organizational resilience to ransomware attacks. Which of the
following would BEST meet the CSO's objectives?
A. Use email-filtering software and centralized account management, patch high-risk systems, and restrict
administration privileges on fileshares.
B. Purchase cyber insurance from a reputable provider to reduce expenses during an incident.
C. Invest in end-user awareness training to change the long-term culture and behavior of staff and executives,
reducing the organization's susceptibility to phishing attacks.
D. Implement application whitelisting and centralized event-log management, and perform regular testing and
validation of full backups.
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 18
A security analyst is investigation an incident that was first reported as an issue connecting to network shares
and the internet, While reviewing logs and tool output, the analyst sees the following:
IP address Physical addess
10.0.0.1 00-18-21-ad-24-bc
10.0.0.114 01-31-a3-ad-23-ab
10.0.0.115 00-18-21-ad-24-bc
10.0.0.116 00-19-08-ba-07-da
10.0.0.117 01-12-21-ca-11-ad
Which of the following attacks has occurred?
A. IP conflict
B. Pass-the-hash
C. MAC flooding
D. Directory traversal
E. ARP poisoning
Correct Answer: E


QUESTION 19
The IT department's on-site developer has been with the team for many years. Each time an application is
released, the security team is able to identify multiple vulnerabilities. Which of the following would BEST help
the team ensure the application is ready to be released to production?
A. Limit the use of third-party libraries.
B. Prevent data exposure queries.
C. Obfuscate the source code.
D. Submit the application to QA before releasing it.
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 20
A software developer needs to perform code-execution testing, black-box testing, and non- functional testing on
a new product before its general release. Which of the following BEST describes the tasks the developer is
conducting?
A. Verification
B. Validation
C. Normalization
D. Staging
Correct Answer: B


Verification does not involve code execution while Validation involves code execution. Verification uses
methods like reviews, walkthroughs, inspections and desk-checking whereas Validation uses methods like
black box testing, white box testing and non-functional testing
QUESTION 21
An auditor is performing an assessment of a security appliance with an embedded OS that was vulnerable
during the last two assessments. Which of the following BEST explains the appliance's vulnerable state?
A. The system was configured with weak default security settings.
B. The device uses weak encryption ciphers.
C. The vendor has not supplied a patch for the appliance.
D. The appliance requires administrative credentials for the assessment.
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 22
A cybersecurity analyst needs to implement secure authentication to third-party websites without users'
passwords. Which of the following would be the BEST way to achieve this objective?
A. OAuth
B. SSO
C. SAML
D. PAP
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 23
A company is adopting a BYOD policy and is looking for a comprehensive solution to protect company
information on user devices. Which of the following solutions would BEST support the policy?
A. Mobile device management
B. Full-device encryption
C. Remote wipe
D. Biometrics
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 24
An organization is concerned that its hosted web servers are not running the most updated version of the
software. Which of the following would work BEST to help identify potential vulnerabilities?
A. Hping3 -s comptia, org -p 80
B. Nc -1 -v comptia, org -p 80
C. nmap comptia, org -p 80 -aV
D. nslookup -port=80 comptia.org
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 25
A researcher has been analyzing large data sets for the last ten months. The researcher works with colleagues
from other institutions and typically connects via SSH to retrieve additional data. Historically, this setup has
worked without issue, but the researcher recently started getting the following message:
Which of the following network attacks is the researcher MOST likely experiencing?
A. MAC cloning
B. Evil twin
C. Man-in-the-middle
D. ARP poisoning
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 26
An employee has been charged with fraud and is suspected of using corporate assets. As authorities collect
evidence, and to preserve the admissibility of the evidence, which of the following forensic techniques should
be used?
A. Order of volatility
B. Data recovery
C. Chain of custody
D. Non-repudiation
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 27
A company has limited storage available and an online presence that cannot for more than four hours be
interrupted. Which is the FASTEST database restore time In the event of a failure, which being maindful of the
limited available storage space?
A. Implement fulltape backup every Sunday at 8:00 p.m and perform nightly tape rotations.
B. Implement differential backups every Sunday at 8:00 and nightly incremental backups at 8:00 p.m
C. Implement nightly full backups every Sunday at 8:00 p.m.
D. Implement full backups every Sunday at 8:00 p.m and nightly differential backups at 8:00 p.m.
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 28
Users have been issued smart cards that provide physical access to a building. The cards also contain tokens
that can be used to access information systems. Users can log in to any thin client located throughout the
building and see the same desktop each time. Which of the following technologies are being utilized to provide
these capabilities? (Select TWO)
A. COPE
B. VDI
C. GPS
D. TOTP
E. RFID
F. BYOD
Correct Answer: BE


QUESTION 29
The SOC is reviewing process and procedures after a recent incident. The review indicates it took more than
30 minutes to determine that quarantining an infected host was the best course of action. That allowed the
malware to spread to additional hosts before it was contained. Which of the following would be BEST to
improve the incident response process?
A. Updating the playbooks with better decision points
B. Dividing the network into trusted and untrusted zones
C. Providing additional end-user training on acceptable use
D. Implementing manual quarantining of infected hosts
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 30
A cybersecurity analyst reviews the log files from a web server and sees a series of files that indicates a
directory-traversal attack has occurred. Which of the following is the analyst MOST likely seeing?
Option A: http://sample.url.com/<script>Please -Visit-Our-Phishing-Site</script>
Option B: http://sample.url.com/someotherpage onsite/../../../etc/shadow
Option C: http://sample.url.com/select-from-database-where-password-null
Option D:http://redirect.sample.url.sampleurl.com/malicios-dns-redirect
A. Option A
B. Option B
C. Option C
D. Option D
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 31
A large industrial system's smart generator monitors the system status and sends alerts to third-party
maintenance personnel when critical failures occur. While reviewing the network logs the company's security
manager notices the generator's IP is sending packets to an internal file server's IP. Which of the following
mitigations would be BEST for the security manager to implement while maintaining alerting capabilities?
A. Segmentation
B. Firewall whitelisting
C. Containment
D. isolation
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 32
A manufacturer creates designs for very high security products that are required to be protected and controlled
by the government regulations. These designs are not accessible by corporate networks or the Internet. Which
of the following is the BEST solution to protect these designs?
A. An air gap
B. A Faraday cage
C. A shielded cable
D. A demilitarized zone
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 33
A security analyst is reviewing the following attack log output:
user comptia\john.smith attempted login with password123
user comptia\jane.doe attempted login with password123
user comptia\user.one attempted login with password123
user comptia\user.two attempted login with password123
user comptia\user.three attempted login with password123
user comptia\john.smith attempted login with password234
user comptia\jane.doe attempted login with password234
user comptia\user.one attempted login with password234
user comptia\user.two attempted login with password234
user comptia\user.three attempted login with password234
Which of the following types of attacks does this MOST likely represent?
A. Rainbow table
B. Brute-force
C. Password-spraying
D. Dictionary
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 34
A security auditor is reviewing vulnerability scan data provided by an internal security team. Which of the
following BEST indicates that valid credentials were used?
A. The scan identified expired SSL certificates
B. The scan enumerated software versions of installed programs
C. The scan produced a list of vulnerabilities on the target host
D. The scan results show open ports, protocols, and services exposed on the target host
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 35
An organization hired a consultant to assist with an active attack, and the consultant was able to identify the
compromised accounts and computers. Which of the following is the consultant MOST likely to recommend to
prepare for eradication?
A. Quarantining the compromised accounts and computers, only providing them with network acces s
B. Segmenting the compromised accounts and computers into a honeynet so as to not alert the attackers.
C. Isolating the compromised accounts and computers, cutting off all network and internet access.
D. Logging off and deleting the compromised accounts and computers to eliminate attacker access.
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 36
The CSIRT is reviewing the lessons learned from a recent incident. A worm was able to spread unhindered
throughout the network and infect a large number of computers and servers. Which of the following
recommendations would be BEST to mitigate the impacts of a similar incident in the future?
A. Install a NIDS device at the boundary.
B. Segment the network with firewalls.
C. Update all antivirus signatures daily.
D. Implement application blacklisting.
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 37
An organization suffered an outage and a critical system took 90 minutes to come back online. Though there
was no data loss during the outage, the expectation was that the critical system would be available again within
60 minutes Which of the following is the 60-minute expectation an example of:
A. MTBF
B. RPO
C. MTTR
D. RTO
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 38
Which of the following will MOST likely adversely impact the operations of unpatched traditional programmablelogic controllers, running a back-end LAMP server and OT systems with human-management interfaces that
are accessible over the Internet via a web interface? (Choose two.)
A. Cross-site scripting
B. Data exfiltration
C. Poor system logging
D. Weak encryption
E. SQL injection
F. Server-side request forgery
Correct Answer: AE


QUESTION 39
Which of the following BEST describes a security exploit for which a vendor patch is not readily available?
A. Integer overflow
B. Zero-day
C. End of life
D. Race condition
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 40
A recent audit uncovered a key finding regarding the use of a specific encryption standard in a web application
that is used to communicate with business customers. Due to the technical limitations of its customers the
company is unable to upgrade the encryption standard. Which of the following types of controls should be used
to reduce the risk created by this scenario?
A. Physical
B. Detective
C. Preventive
D. Compensating
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 41
While checking logs, a security engineer notices a number of end users suddenly downloading files with the
.tar.gz extension. Closer examination of the files reveals they are PE32 files. The end users state they did not
initiate any of the downloads. Further investigation reveals the end users all clicked on an external email
containing an infected MHT file with an href link a week prior. Which of the following is MOST likely occurring?
A. A RAT was installed and is transferring additional exploit tools.
B. The workstations are beaconing to a command-and-control server.
C. A logic bomb was executed and is responsible for the data transfers.
D. A fileless virus is spreading in the local network environment.
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 42
A security auditor is reviewing vulnerability scan data provided by an internal security team. Which of the
following BEST indicates that valid credentials were used?
A. The scan results show open ports, protocols, and services exposed on the target host
B. The scan enumerated software versions of installed programs
C. The scan produced a list of vulnerabilities on the target host
D. The scan identified expired SSL certificates
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 43
The IT department at a university is concerned about professors placing servers on the university network in an
attempt to bypass security controls. Which of the following BEST represents this type of threat?
A. A script kiddie
B. Shadow IT
C. Hacktivism
D. White-hat
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 44
A security analyst is preparing a threat for an upcoming internal penetration test. The analyst needs to identify a
method for determining the tactics, techniques, and procedures of a threat against the organization's network.
Which of the following will the analyst MOST likely use to accomplish the objective?
A. A table exercise
B. NST CSF
C. MITRE ATT$CK
D. OWASP
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 45
A company wants to deploy PKI on its Internet-facing website. The applications that are currently deployed are:
* www.company.com (main website)
* contactus.company.com (for locating a nearby location)
* quotes.company.com (for requesting a price quote)
The company wants to purchase one SSL certificate that will work for all the existing applications and any future
applications that follow the same naming conventions, such as store.company.com. Which of the following
certificate types would BEST meet the requirements?
A. SAN
B. Wildcard
C. Extended validation
D. Self-signed
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 46
A company recently moved sensitive videos between on-premises. Company-owned websites. The company
then learned the videos had been uploaded and shared to the internet. Which of the following would MOST
likely allow the company to find the cause?
A. Checksums
B. Watermarks
C. Order of volatility
D. A log analysis
E. A right-to-audit clause
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 47
A network engineer notices the VPN concentrator overloaded and crashes on days when there are a lot of
remote workers. Senior management has placed greater importance on the availability of VPN resources for
the remote workers than the security of the end users' traffic. Which of the following would be BEST to solve
this issue?
A. iPSec
B. Always On
C. Split tunneling
D. L2TP
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 48
A security analyst has been asked to investigate a situation after the SOC started to receive alerts from the
SIEM. The analyst first looks at the domain controller and finds the following events:
To better understand what is going on, the analyst runs a command and receives the following output:
Based on the analyst's findings, which of the following attacks is being executed?
A. Credential harvesting
B. Keylogger
C. Brute-force
D. Spraying
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 49
A company recently transitioned to a strictly BYOD culture due to the cost of replacing lost or damaged
corporate-owned mobile devices. Which of the following technologies would be BEST to balance the BYOD
culture while also protecting the company's data?
A. Containerization
B. Geofencing
C. Full-disk encryption
D. Remote wipe
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 50
Which of the following BEST explains the reason why a server administrator would place a document named
password.txt on the desktop of an administrator account on a server?
A. The document is a honeyfile and is meant to attract the attention of a cyberintruder.
B. The document is a backup file if the system needs to be recovered.
C. The document is a standard file that the OS needs to verify the login credentials.
D. The document is a keylogger that stores all keystrokes should the account be compromised.
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 51
A recent malware outbreak across a subnet included successful rootkit installations on many PCs, ensuring
persistence by rendering remediation efforts ineffective. Which of the following would BEST detect the
presence of a rootkit in the future?
A. FDE
B. NIDS
C. EDR
D. DLP
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 52
Company engineers regularly participate in a public Internet forum with other engineers throughout the industry.
Which of the following tactics would an attacker MOST likely use in this scenario?
A. Watering-hole attack
B. Credential harvesting
C. Hybrid warfare
D. Pharming
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 53
Which of the following refers to applications and systems that are used within an organization without consent
or approval?
A. Shadow IT
B. OSINT
C. Dark web
D. Insider threats
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 54
In the middle of a cybersecurity incident, a security engineer removes the infected devices from the network
and lock down all compromised accounts. In which of the following incident response phases is the security
engineer currently operating?
A. Identification
B. Preparation
C. Eradiction
D. Recovery
E. Containment
Correct Answer: E


QUESTION 55
Which of the following is the purpose of a risk register?
A. To define the level or risk using probability and likelihood
B. To register the risk with the required regulatory agencies
C. To identify the risk, the risk owner, and the risk measures
D. To formally log the type of risk mitigation strategy the organization is using
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 56
A pharmaceutical sales representative logs on to a laptop and connects to the public WiFi to check emails and
update reports. Which of the following would be BEST to prevent other devices on the network from directly
accessing the laptop? (Choose two.)
A. Trusted Platform Module
B. A host-based firewall
C. A DLP solution
D. Full disk encryption
E. A VPN
F. Antivirus software
Correct Answer: BE


QUESTION 57
In which of the following common use cases would steganography be employed?
A. Obfuscation
B. Integrity
C. Non-repudiation
D. Blockchain
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 58
A company's bank has reported that multiple corporate credit cards have been stolen over the past several
weeks. The bank has provided the names of the affected cardholders to the company's forensics team to assist
in the cyber-incident investigation. An incident responder learns the following information:
* The timeline of stolen card numbers corresponds closely with affected users making Internet-based
purchases from diverse websites via enterprise desktop PCs.
* All purchase connections were encrypted, and the company uses an SSL inspection proxy for the inspection
of encrypted traffic of the hardwired network.
* Purchases made with corporate cards over the corporate guest WiFi network, where no SSL inspection
occurs, were unaffected.
Which of the following is the MOST likely root cause?
A. HTTPS sessions are being downgraded to insecure cipher suites
B. The SSL inspection proxy is feeding events to a compromised SIEM
C. The payment providers are insecurely processing credit card charges
D. The adversary has not yet established a presence on the guest WiFi network
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 59
After a ransomware attack a forensics company needs to review a cryptocurrency transaction between the
victim and the attacker. Which of the following will the company MOST likely review to trace this transaction?
A. The public ledger
B. The NetFlow data
C. A checksum
D. The event log
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 60
During an incident response, a security analyst observes the following log entry on the web server:
GET http://www.companysite.com/product_info.phy?show=../../../../etc/password HTTP/1.1
Host: www.companysite.com
Which of the following BEST describes the type of attack the analyst is experiencing?
A. SQL injection
B. Cross-site scripting
C. Pass-the-hash
D. Directory traversal
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 61
A remote user recently took a two-week vacation abroad and brought along a corporate- owned laptop. Upon
returning to work, the user has been unable to connect the laptop to the VPN. Which of the following is the
MOST likely reason for the user's inability to connect the laptop to the VPN?
A. Due to foreign travel, the user's laptop was isolated from the network.
B. The user's laptop was quarantined because it missed the latest patch update.
C. The VPN client was blacklisted.
D. The user's account was put on a legal hold.
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 62
A root cause analysis reveals that a web application outage was caused by one of the company's developers
uploading a newer version of the third-party libraries that were shared among several applications. Which of the
following implementations would be BEST to prevent the issue from reoccurring?
A. CASB
B. SWG
C. Containerization
D. Automated failover
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 63
A user recently entered a username and password into a recruiting application website that had been forged to
look like the legitimate site Upon investigation, a security analyst the identifies the following:
* The legitimate websites IP address is 10.1.1.20 and eRecruit local resolves to the IP
* The forged website's IP address appears to be 10.2.12.99. based on NetFlow records
* AH three at the organization's DNS servers show the website correctly resolves to the legitimate IP
* DNS query logs show one of the three DNS servers returned a result of 10.2.12.99 (cached) at the
approximate time of the suspected compromise.
Which of the following MOST likely occurred?
A. A reverse proxy was used to redirect network traffic
B. An SSL strip MITM attack was performed
C. An attacker temporarily pawned a name server
D. An ARP poisoning attack was successfully executed
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 64
Which of the following technical controls is BEST suited for the detection and prevention of buffer overflows on
hosts?
A. DLP
B. HIDS
C. EDR
D. NIPS
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 65
A security administrator suspects an employee has been emailing proprietary information to a competitor.
Company policy requires the administrator to capture an exact copy of the employee's hard disk. Which of the
following should the administrator use?
A. logger
B. chmod
C. dd
D. dnsenum
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 66
A security analyst is performing a packet capture on a series of SOAP HTTP requests for a security
assessment. The analyst redirects the output to a file. After the capture is complete, the analyst needs to review
the first transactions quickly and then search the entire series of requests for a particular string. Which of the
following would be BEST to use to accomplish the task? (Select TWO).
A. head
B. Tcpdump
C. grep
D. rail
E. curl
F. openssi
G. dd
Correct Answer: AC


QUESTION 67
A security analyst needs to generate a server certificate to be used for 802.1X and secure RDP connections.
The analyst is unsure what is required to perform the task and solicits help from a senior colleague. Which of
the following is the FIRST step the senior colleague will most likely tell the analyst to perform to accomplish this
task?
A. Create an OCSP
B. Generate a CSR
C. Create a CRL
D. Generate a .pfx file
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 68
Which of the following describes the BEST approach for deploying application patches?
A. Apply the patches to systems in a testing environment then to systems in a staging environment, and finally
to production systems.
B. Test the patches in a staging environment, develop against them in the development environment, and then
apply them to the production systems
C. Test the patches in a test environment apply them to the production systems and then apply them to a
staging environment
D. Apply the patches to the production systems apply them in a staging environment, and then test all of them
in a testing environment
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 69
When selecting a technical solution for identity management, an architect chooses to go from an in-house to a
third-party SaaS provider. Which of the following risk management strategies is this an example of?
A. Acceptance
B. Mitigation
C. Avoidance
D. Transference
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 70
A cybersecurity administrator has a reduced team and needs to operate an on-premises network and security
infrastructure efficiently. To help with the situation, the administrator decides to hire a service provider. Which of
the following should the administrator use?
A. SDP
B. AAA
C. IaaS
D. MSSP
E. Microservices
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 71
A security analyst is looking for a solution to help communicate to the leadership team the severity levels of the
organization's vulnerabilities. Which of the following would BEST meet this need?
A. CVE
B. SIEM
C. SOAR
D. CVSS
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 72
A workwide manufacturing company has been experiencing email account compromise. In one incident, a user
logged in from the corporate office in France, but then seconds later, the same user account attempted a login
from Brazil. Which of the following account policies would BEST prevent this type of attack?
A. Network location
B. Impossible travel time
C. Geolocation
D. Geofencing
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 73
A global pandemic is forcing a private organization to close some business units and reduce staffing at others.
Which of the following would be BEST to help the organization's executives determine the next course of
action?
A. An incident response plan
B. A communications plan
C. A disaster recovery plan
D. A business continuity plan
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 74
Several employees return to work the day after attending an industry trade show. That same day, the security
manager notices several malware alerts coming from each of the employee's workstations. The security
manager investigates but finds no signs of an attack on the perimeter firewall or the NIDS. Which of the
following is MOST likely causing the malware alerts?
A. A worm that has propagated itself across the intranet, which was initiated by presentation media
B. A fileless virus that is contained on a vCard that is attempting to execute an attack
C. A Trojan that has passed through and executed malicious code on the hosts
D. A USB flash drive that is trying to run malicious code but is being blocked by the host firewall
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 75
Which of the following would MOST likely support the integrity of a voting machine?
A. Asymmetric encryption
B. Blockchain
C. Transport Layer Security
D. Perfect forward secrecy
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 76
A cybersecurity administrator needs to add disk redundancy for a critical server. The solution must have a twodrive failure for better fault tolerance. Which of the following RAID levels should the administrator select?
A. 0
B. 1
C. 5
D. 6
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 77
A security incident may have occurred on the desktop PC of an organization's Chief Executive Officer (CEO) A
duplicate copy of the CEO's hard drive must be stored securely to ensure appropriate forensic processes and
the chain of custody are followed. Which of the following should be performed to accomplish this task?
A. Install a new hard drive in the CEO's PC, and then remove the old hard drive and place it in a tamperevident bag
B. Connect a write blocker to the hard drive Then leveraging a forensic workstation, utilize the dd command m
a live Linux environment to create a duplicate copy
C. Remove the CEO's hard drive from the PC, connect to the forensic workstation, and copy all the contents
onto a remote fileshare while the CEO watches
D. Refrain from completing a forensic analysts of the CEO's hard drive until after the incident is confirmed,
duplicating the hard drive at this stage could destroy evidence
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 78
A Chief Information Security Officer (CISO) needs to create a policy set that meets international standards for
data privacy and sharing. Which of the following should the CISO read and understand before writing the
policies?
A. PCI DSS
B. GDPR
C. NIST
D. ISO 31000
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 79
A network administrator needs to build out a new datacenter, with a focus on resiliency and uptime. Which of
the following would BEST meet this objective? (Choose two.)
A. Dual power supply
B. Off-site backups
C. Automatic OS upgrades
D. NIC teaming
E. Scheduled penetration testing
F. Network-attached storage
Correct Answer: AD


QUESTION 80
A company recently experienced a data breach and the source was determined to be an executive who was
charging a phone in a public area. Which of the following would MOST likely have prevented this breach?
A. A firewall
B. A device pin
C. A USB data blocker
D. Biometrics
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 81
An organization has a growing workforce that is mostly driven by additions to the sales department. Each newly
hired salesperson relies on a mobile device to conduct business. The Chief Information Officer (CIO) is
wondering if the organization may need to scale down just as quickly as it scaled up. The ClO is also concerned
about the organization's security and customer privacy. Which of the following would be BEST to address the
ClO's concerns?
A. Disallow new hires from using mobile devices for six months
B. Select four devices for the sales department to use in a CYOD model
C. Implement BYOD for the sales department while leveraging the MDM
D. Deploy mobile devices using the COPE methodology
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 82
A company has drafted an insider-threat policy that prohibits the use of external storage devices. Which of the
following would BEST protect the company from data exfiltration via removable media?
A. Monitoring large data transfer transactions in the firewall logs
B. Developing mandatory training to educate employees about the removable media policy
C. Implementing a group policy to block user access to system files
D. Blocking removable-media devices and write capabilities using a host-based security tool
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 83
A system administrator needs to implement an access control scheme that will allow an object's access policy
be determined by its owner. Which of the following access control schemes BEST fits the requirements?
A. Role-based access control
B. Discretionary access control
C. Mandatory access control
D. Attribute-based access control
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 84
A commercial cyber-threat intelligence organization observes IoCs across a variety of unrelated customers.
Prior to releasing specific threat intelligence to other paid subscribers, the organization is MOST likely obligated
by contracts to:
A. perform attribution to specific APTs and nation-state actors.
B. anonymize any PII that is observed within the IoC data.
C. add metadata to track the utilization of threat intelligence reports.
D. assist companies with impact assessments based on the observed data.
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 85
A Chief Security Officer (CSO) is concerned about the amount of PII that is stored locally on each
salesperson's laptop. The sales department has a higher-than-average rate of lost equipment. Which of the
following recommendations would BEST address the CSO's concern?
A. Deploy an MDM solution.
B. Implement managed FDE.
C. Replace all hard drives with SEDs.
D. Install DLP agents on each laptop.
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 86
An analyst visits an internet forum looking for information about a tool. The analyst finds a threat that appears to
contain relevant information. One of the posts says the following:
Hello everyone,
 I am having the same problem with my server. Can you help me?
<script type="text/javascript" src=http://src=http://website.com/user.js>
Onload=sqlexec();
</script>
Thanks you,
Joe
Which of the following BEST describes the attack that was attempted against the forum readers?
A. SOU attack
B. DLL attack
C. XSS attack
D. API attack
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 87
Which of the following is a team of people dedicated testing the effectiveness of organizational security
programs by emulating the techniques of potential attackers?
A. Red team
B. White team
C. Blue team
D. Purple team
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 88
An organization with a low tolerance for user inconvenience wants to protect laptop hard drives against loss or
data theft. Which of the following would be the MOST acceptable?
A. SED
B. HSM
C. DLP
D. TPM
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 89
A financial organization has adopted a new secure, encrypted document-sharing application to help with its
customer loan process. Some important PII needs to be shared across this new platform, but it is getting
blocked by the DLP systems. Which of the following actions will BEST allow the PII to be shared with the
secure application without compromising the organization's security posture?
A. Configure the DLP policies to allow all PII
B. Configure the firewall to allow all ports that are used by this application
C. Configure the antivirus software to allow the application
D. Configure the DLP policies to whitelist this application with the specific PII
E. Configure the application to encrypt the PII
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 90
Which of the following cloud models provides clients with servers, storage, and networks but nothing else?
A. SaaS
B. PaaS
C. IaaS
D. DaaS
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 91
A network administrator would like to configure a site-to-site VPN utilizing iPSec. The administrator wants the
tunnel to be established with data integrity encryption, authentication and anti- replay functions. Which of the
following should the administrator use when configuring the VPN ?
A. AH
B. EDR
C. ESP
D. DNSSEC
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 92
Which of the following job roles would sponsor data quality and data entry initiatives that ensure business and
regulatory requirements are met?
A. The data owner
B. The data processor
C. The data steward
D. The data privacy officer.
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 93
A small company that does not have security staff wants to improve its security posture. Which of the following
would BEST assist the company?
A. MSSP
B. SOAR
C. IaaS
D. PaaS
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 94
A startup company is using multiple SaaS and IaaS platforms to stand up a corporate infrastructure and build
out a customer-facing web application. Which of the following solutions would be BEST to provide security,
manageability, and visibility into the platforms?
A. SIEM
B. DLP
C. CASB
D. SWG
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 95
The Chief Executive Officer (CEO) of an organization would like staff members to have the flexibility to work
from home anytime during business hours, incident during a pandemic or crisis, However, the CEO is
concerned that some staff members may take advantage of the of the flexibility and work from high-risk
countries while on holidays work at a third-party organization in another country. The Chief information Officer
(CIO) believes the company can implement some basic controls to mitigate the majority of the risk. Which of
the following would be BEST to mitigate CEO's concern? (Select TWO).
A. Geolocation
B. Time-of-day restrictions
C. Certificates
D. Tokens
E. Geotagging
F. Role-based access controls
Correct Answer: AB


QUESTION 96
After entering a username and password, and administrator must gesture on a touch screen. Which of the
following demonstrates what the administrator is providing?
A. Multifactor authentication
B. Something you can do
C. Biometric
D. Two-factor authentication
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 97
Joe, an employee, receives an email stating he won the lottery. The email includes a link that requests a name,
mobile phone number, address, and date of birth be provided to confirm Joe's identity before sending him the
prize. Which of the following BEST describes this type of email?
A. Spear phishing
B. Whaling
C. Phishing
D. Vishing
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 98
A security administrator checks the table of a network switch, which shows the following output:
VLAN Physical Address Type Port
 1 001a:42ff:5113 Dynamic GE0/5
 1 0faa:abcf:ddee Dynamic GE0/5
 1 c6a9:6616:758e Dynamic GE0/5
 1 a1a3:b6a3:1212 Dynamic GE0/5
 1 6025:2ad8:bca2 Dynamic GE0/5
 1 b935:f995:b00b Dynamic GE0/5
Which of the following is happening to this switch?
A. MAC Flooding
B. DNS poisoning
C. MAC cloning
D. ARP poisoning
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 99
A company uses wireless for all laptops and keeps a very detailed record of its assets, along with a
comprehensive list of devices that are authorized to be on the wireless network. The Chief Information Officer
(CIO) is concerned about a script kiddie potentially using an unauthorized device to brute force the wireless
PSK and obtain access to the internal network. Which of the following should the company implement to BEST
prevent this from occurring?
A. BDU guard
B. WPA-EAP
C. IP filtering
D. A WIDS
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 100
An organization is developing an authentication service for use at the entry and exit ports of country borders.
The service will use data feeds obtained from passport systems, passenger manifests, and high- definition
video feeds from CCTV systems that are located at the ports. The service will incorporate machine-learning
techniques to eliminate biometric enrollment processes while still allowing authorities to identify passengers
with increasing accuracy over time. The more frequently passengers travel, the more accurately the service will
identify them. Which of the following biometrics will MOST likely be used, without the need for enrollment?
(Choose two.)
A. Voice
B. Gait
C. Vein
D. Facial
E. Retina
F. Fingerprinting
Correct Answer: BD


QUESTION 101
A user contacts the help desk to report the following:
* Two days ago, a pop-up browser window prompted the user for a name and password after connecting to the
corporate wireless SSID. This had never happened before, but the user entered the information as requested.
* The user was able to access the Internet but had trouble accessing the department share until the next day.
* The user is now getting notifications from the bank about unauthorized transactions.
Which of the following attack vectors was MOST likely used in this scenario?
A. Rogue access point
B. Evil twin
C. DNS poisoning
D. ARP poisoning
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 102
A vulnerability assessment report will include the CVSS score of the discovered vulnerabilities because the
score allows the organization to better.
A. validate the vulnerability exists in the organization's network through penetration testing
B. research the appropriate mitigation techniques in a vulnerability database
C. find the software patches that are required to mitigate a vulnerability
D. prioritize remediation of vulnerabilities based on the possible impact.
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 103
A network administrator has been alerted that web pages are experiencing long load times. After determining it
is not a routing or DNS issue, the administrator logs in to the router, runs a command, and receives the
following output:
Which of the following is the router experiencing?
A. DDoS attack
B. Memory leak
C. Buffer overflow
D. Resource exhaustion
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 104
A security analyst receives a SIEM alert that someone logged in to the appadmin test account, which is only
used for the early detection of attacks. The security analyst then reviews the following application log:
Which of the following can the security analyst conclude?
A. A replay attack is being conducted against the application.
B. An injection attack is being conducted against a user authentication system.
C. A service account password may have been changed, resulting in continuous failed logins within the
application.
D. A credentialed vulnerability scanner attack is testing several CVEs against the application.
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 105
Joe, a user at a company, clicked an email link led to a website that infected his workstation. Joe, was
connected to the network, and the virus spread to the network shares. The protective measures failed to stop
this virus, and It has continued to evade detection. Which of the following should administrator implement to
protect the environment from this malware?
A. Install a definition-based antivirus.
B. Implement an IDS/IPS
C. Implement a heuristic behavior-detection solution.
D. Implement CASB to protect the network shares.
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 106
A network administrator is setting up wireless access points in all the conference rooms and wants to
authenticate device using PKI. Which of the following should the administrator configure?
A. A captive portal
B. PSK
C. 802.1X
D. WPS
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 107
A company processes highly sensitive data and senior management wants to protect the sensitive data by
utilizing classification labels. Which of the following access control schemes would be BEST for the company to
implement?
A. Discretionary
B. Rule-based
C. Role-based
D. Mandatory
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 108
A website developer is working on a new e-commerce website and has asked an information security expert for
the most appropriate way to store credit card numbers to create an easy reordering process. Which of the
following methods would BEST accomplish this goal?
A. Salting the magnetic strip information
B. Encrypting the credit card information in transit.
C. Hashing the credit card numbers upon entry.
D. Tokenizing the credit cards in the database
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 109
Which of the following ISO standards is certified for privacy?
A. ISO 9001
B. ISO 27002
C. ISO 27701
D. ISO 31000
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 110
An organization wants to implement a third factor to an existing multifactor authentication. The organization
already uses a smart card and password. Which of the following would meet the organization's needs for a third
factor?
A. Date of birth
B. Fingerprint
C. PIN
D. TPM
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 111
An organization that is located in a flood zone is MOST likely to document the concerns associated with the
restoration of IT operation in a:
A. business continuity plan
B. communications plan.
C. disaster recovery plan.
D. continuity of operations plan
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 112
A university with remote campuses, which all use different service providers, loses Internet connectivity across
all locations. After a few minutes, Internet and VoIP services are restored, only to go offline again at random
intervals, typically within four minutes of services being restored. Outages continue throughout the day,
impacting all inbound and outbound connections and services. Services that are limited to the local LAN or WiFi
network are not impacted, but all WAN and VoIP services are affected. Later that day, the edge-router
manufacturer releases a CVE outlining the ability of an attacker to exploit the SIP protocol handling on devices,
leading to resource exhaustion and system reloads. Which of the following BEST describe this type of attack?
(Choose two.)
A. DoS
B. SSL stripping
C. Memory leak
D. Race condition
E. Shimming
F. Refactoring
Correct Answer: AC


QUESTION 113
A security analyst discovers that a company username and password database was posted on an Internet
forum. The username and passwords are stored in plain text. Which of the following would mitigate the damage
done by this type of data exfiltration in the future?
A. Create DLP controls that prevent documents from leaving the network
B. Implement salting and hashing
C. Configure the web content filter to block access to the forum.
D. Increase password complexity requirements
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 114
A host was infected with malware. During the incident response, Joe, a user, reported that he did not receive
any emails with links, but he had been browsing the Internet all day. Which of the following would MOST likely
show where the malware originated?
A. The DNS logs
B. The web server logs
C. The SIP traffic logs
D. The SNMP logs
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 115
A smart switch has the ability to monitor electrical levels and shut off power to a building in the event of power
surge or other fault situation. The switch was installed on a wired network in a hospital and is monitored by the
facilities department via a cloud application. The security administrator isolated the switch on a separate VLAN
and set up a patch routine. Which of the following steps should also be taken to harden the smart switch?
A. Set up an air gap for the switch.
B. Change the default password for the switch.
C. Place the switch In a Faraday cage.
D. Install a cable lock on the switch
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 116
Which of the following policies would help an organization identify and mitigate potential single points of failure
in the company's IT/security operations?
A. Least privilege
B. Awareness training
C. Separation of duties
D. Mandatory vacation
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 117
In which of the following situations would it be BEST to use a detective control type for mitigation?
A. A company implemented a network load balancer to ensure 99.999% availability of its web application.
B. A company designed a backup solution to increase the chances of restoring services in case of a natural
disaster.
C. A company purchased an application-level firewall to isolate traffic between the accounting department and
the information technology department.
D. A company purchased an IPS system, but after reviewing the requirements, the appliance was supposed to
monitor, not block, any traffic.
E. A company purchased liability insurance for flood protection on all capital assets.
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 118
An organization's RPO for a critical system is two hours. The system is used Monday through Friday, from 9:00
am to 5:00 pm. Currently, the organization performs a full backup every Saturday that takes four hours to
complete. Which of the following additional backup implementations would be the BEST way for the analyst to
meet the business requirements?
A. Incremental backups Monday through Friday at 6:00 p.m and differential backups hourly
B. Full backups Monday through Friday at 6:00 p.m and incremental backups hourly.
C. incremental backups Monday through Friday at 6:00 p.m and full backups hourly.
D. Full backups Monday through Friday at 6:00 p.m and differential backups hourly.
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 119
On which of the following is the live acquisition of data for forensic analysis MOST dependent? (Choose two.)
A. Data accessibility
B. Legal hold
C. Cryptographic or hash algorithm
D. Data retention legislation
E. Value and volatility of data
F. Right-to-audit clauses
Correct Answer: AE


QUESTION 120
An organization just experienced a major cyberattack. The attack was well coordinated sophisticated and highly
skilled. Which of the following targeted the organization?
A. Shadow IT
B. An insider threat
C. A hacktivist
D. An advanced persistent threat
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 121
Which of the following describes the ability of code to target a hypervisor from inside
A. Fog computing
B. VM escape
C. Software-defined networking
D. Image forgery
E. Container breakout
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 122
A security analyst discovers several .jpg photos from a cellular phone during a forensics investigation involving
a compromised system. The analyst runs a forensics tool to gather file metadata. Which of the following would
be part of the images if all the metadata is still intact?
A. The GPS location
B. When the file was deleted
C. The total number of print jobs
D. The number of copies made
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 123
Which of the following are the MOST likely vectors for the unauthorized inclusion of vulnerable code in a
software company's final software releases? (Select TWO.)
A. Unsecure protocols
B. Use of penetration-testing utilities
C. Weak passwords
D. Included third-party libraries
E. Vendors/supply chain
F. Outdated anti-malware software
Correct Answer: DE


QUESTION 124
A small business just recovered from a ransomware attack against its file servers by purchasing the decryption
keys from the attackers. The issue was triggered by a phishing email and the IT administrator wants to ensure it
does not happen again. Which of the following should the IT administrator do FIRST after recovery?
A. Scan the NAS for residual or dormant malware and take new daily backups that are tested on a frequent
basis
B. Restrict administrative privileges and patch ail systems and applications.
C. Rebuild all workstations and install new antivirus software
D. Implement application whitelisting and perform user application hardening
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 125
A company recently set up an e-commerce portal to sell its product online. The company wants to start
accepting credit cards for payment, which requires compliance with a security standard. Which of the following
standards must the company comply with before accepting credit cards on its e-commerce platform?
A. PCI DSS
B. ISO 22301
C. ISO 27001
D. NIST CSF
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 126
A forensics investigator is examining a number of unauthorized payments the were reported on the company's
website. Some unusual log entries show users received an email for an unwanted mailing list and clicked on a
link to attempt to unsubscribe. One of the users reported the email to the phishing team, and the forwarded
email revealed the link to be:
<a=href="https://www.company.com/payto.do?/routing=00001111&account=22223334&amount=250">click
here to unsubscribe</a>
Which of the following will the forensics investigator MOST likely determine has occurred?
A. SQL injection
B. CSRF
C. XSS
D. XSRF
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 127
A financial analyst is expecting an email containing sensitive information from a client. When the email arrives,
the analyst receives an error and is unable to open the encrypted message. Which of the following is the MOST
likely cause of the issue?
A. The S/MIME plug-in is not enabled.
B. The SLL certificate has expired.
C. Secure IMAP was not implemented
D. POP3S is not supported.
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 128
A security analyst sees the following log output while reviewing web logs:
[02/Feb/2019:03:39:21 -0000 23.35.212.99 12.59.34.88 -"GET /uri/input.action?query=%2f..%2f..%..2fetc%
2fpasswd HTTP/1.0" 80 200 200
[02/Feb/2019:03:39:21 -0000 23.35.212.99 12.59.34.88 -"GET /uri/input.action?query=/../../../etc/fpasswd
HTTP/1.0" 80 200 200
Which of the following mitigation strategies would be BEST to prevent this attack from being successful?
A. Secure cookies
B. Input validation
C. Code signing
D. Stored procedures
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 129
A security administrator needs to create a RAID configuration that is focused on high read speeds and fault
tolerance. It is unlikely that multiple drivers will fail simultaneously. Which of the following RAID configurations
should the administration use?
A. RAID 0
B. RAID1
C. RAID 5
D. RAID 10
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 130
A recently discovered zero-day exploit utilizes an unknown vulnerability in the SMB network protocol to rapidly
infect computers. Once infected, computers are encrypted and held for ransom. Which of the following would
BEST prevent this attack from reoccurring?
A. Configure the perimeter firewall to deny inbound external connections to SMB ports.
B. Ensure endpoint detection and response systems are alerting on suspicious SMB connections.
C. Deny unauthenticated users access to shared network folders.
D. Verify computers are set to install monthly operating system, updates automatically.
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 131
Which of the following BEST explains the difference between a data owner and a data custodian?
A. The data owner is responsible for adhering to the rules for using the data, while the data custodian is
responsible for determining the corporate governance regarding the data
B. The data owner is responsible for determining how the data may be used, while the data custodian is
responsible for implementing the protection to the data
C. The data owner is responsible for controlling the data, while the data custodian is responsible for
maintaining the chain of custody when handling the data
D. The data owner grants the technical permissions for data access, while the data custodian maintains the
database access controls to the data
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 132
A user reports constant lag and performance issues with the wireless network when working at a local coffee
shop. A security analyst walks the user through an installation of Wireshark and get a five-minute pcap to
analyze. The analyst observes the following output:
 No. Time Source Destination Protocol Length Info
1234 9.1195665 Sagemcon_87:9fa3 Broadcast 802.11 38 Deauthentication, SN=655, FN=0
1235 9.1265649 Sagemcon_87:9fa3 Broadcast 802.11 39 Deauthentication, SN=655, FN=0
1236 9.2223213 Sagemcon_87:9fa3 Broadcast 802.11 38 Deauthentication, SN=657, FN=0
What type of attack will most likely be attempted next?
A. Session replay
B. Evil twin
C. Bluejacking
D. ARP poisoning
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 133
A security audit has revealed that a process control terminal is vulnerable to malicious users installing and
executing software on the system. The terminal is beyond end-of-life support and cannot be upgraded, so it is
placed on a protected network segment. Which of the following would be MOST effective to implement to
further mitigate the reported vulnerability?
A. DNS sinkholeing
B. DLP rules on the terminal
C. An IP blacklist
D. Application whitelisting
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 134
A network administrator has been asked to install an IDS to improve the security posture of an organization.
Which of the following control types is an IDS?
A. Corrective
B. Physical
C. Detective
D. Administrative
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 135
Which of the following would be BEST to establish between organizations to define the responsibilities of each
party and outline the key deliverables and include monetary penalties for breaches to manage third-party risk?
A. An ARO
B. An MOU
C. An SLA
D. A BPA
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 136
An organization has hired a security analyst to perform a penetration test. The analyst captures 1Gb worth of
inbound network traffic to the server and transfer the pcap back to the machine for analysis. Which of the
following tools should the analyst use to further review the pcap?
A. Nmap
B. cURL
C. Netcat
D. Wireshark
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 137
An organization needs to implement more stringent controls over administrator/root credentials and service
accounts. Requirements for the project include:
* Check-in/checkout of credentials
* The ability to use but not know the password
* Automated password changes
* Logging of access to credentials
Which of the following solutions would meet the requirements?
A. OAuth 2.0
B. Secure Enclave
C. A privileged access management system
D. An OpenID Connect authentication system
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 138
A security analyst needs to be proactive in understand the types of attacks that could potentially target the
company's execute. Which of the following intelligence sources should to security analyst review?
A. Vulnerability feeds
B. Trusted automated exchange of indicator information
C. Structured threat information expression
D. Industry information-sharing and collaboration groups
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 139
A critical file server is being upgraded and the systems administrator must determine which RAID level the new
server will need to achieve parity and handle two simultaneous disk failures. Which of the following RAID levels
meets this requirements?
A. RAID 0+1
B. RAID 2
C. RAID 5
D. RAID 6
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 140
A database administrator needs to ensure all passwords are stored in a secure manner, so the administrator
adds randomly generated data to each password before string. Which of the following techniques BEST
explains this action?
A. Predictability
B. Key stretching
C. Salting
D. Hashing
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 141
A development team employs a practice of bringing all the code changes from multiple team members into the
same development project through automation. A tool is utilized to validate the code and track source code
through version control. Which of the following BEST describes this process?
A. Continuous delivery
B. Continuous integration
C. Continuous validation
D. Continuous monitoring
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 142
A company is implementing MFA for all applications that store sensitive data. The IT manager wants MFA to be
non-disruptive and user friendly. Which of the following technologies should the IT manager use when
implementing MFA?
A. One-time passwords
B. Email tokens
C. Push notifications
D. Hardware authentication
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 143
A security analyst is reviewing a new website that will soon be made publicly available. The analyst sees the
following in the URL:
http://dev-site.comptia.org/home/show.php?sessionID=77276554&loc=us
The analyst then sends an internal user a link to the new website for testing purposes, and when the user clicks
the link, the analyst is able to browse the website with the following URL:
http://dev-site.comptia.org/home/show.php?sessionID=98988475&loc=us
Which of the following application attacks is being tested?
A. Pass-the-hash
B. Session replay
C. Object deference
D. Cross-site request forgery
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 144
Which of the following is MOST likely to outline the roles and responsibilities of data controllers and data
processors?
A. SSAE SOC 2
B. PCI DSS
C. GDPR
D. ISO 31000
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 145
A company's Chief Information Office (CIO) is meeting with the Chief Information Security Officer (CISO) to
plan some activities to enhance the skill levels of the company's developers. Which of the following would be
MOST suitable for training the developers'?
A. A capture-the-flag competition
B. A phishing simulation
C. Physical security training
D. Basic awareness training
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 146
A security analyst has received an alert about being sent via email. The analyst's Chief information Security
Officer (CISO) has made it clear that PII must be handled with extreme care From which of the following did the
alert MOST likely originate?
A. S/MIME
B. DLP
C. IMAP
D. HIDS
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 147
A public relations team will be taking a group of guests on a tour through the facility of a large e-commerce
company. The day before the tour, the company sends out an email to employees to ensure all whiteboards are
cleaned and all desks are cleared. The company is MOST likely trying to protect against.
A. Loss of proprietary information
B. Damage to the company's reputation
C. Social engineering
D. Credential exposure
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 148
After reading a security bulletin, a network security manager is concerned that a malicious actor may have
breached the network using the same software flaw. The exploit code is publicly available and has been
reported as being used against other industries in the same vertical. Which of the following should the network
security manager consult FIRST to determine a priority list for forensic review?
A. The vulnerability scan output
B. The IDS logs
C. The full packet capture data
D. The SIEM alerts
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 149
A company provides mobile devices to its users to permit access to email and enterprise applications. The
company recently started allowing users to select from several different vendors and device models. When
configuring the MDM, which of the following is a key security implication of this heterogeneous device
approach?
A. The most common set of MDM configurations will become the effective set of enterprise mobile security
controls.
B. All devices will need to support SCEP-based enrollment; therefore, the heterogeneity of the chosen
architecture may unnecessarily expose private keys to adversaries.
C. Certain devices are inherently less secure than others, so compensatory controls will be needed to address
the delta between device vendors.
D. MDMs typically will not support heterogeneous deployment environments, so multiple MDMs will need to be
installed and configured.
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 150
Which of the following should be put in place when negotiating with a new vendor about the timeliness of the
response to a significant outage or incident?
A. MOU
B. MTTR
C. SLA
D. NDA
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 151
Which of the following types of controls is a turnstile?
A. Physical
B. Detective
C. Corrective
D. Technical
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 152
To secure an application after a large data breach, an e-commerce site will be resetting all users' credentials.
Which of the following will BEST ensure the site's users are not compromised after the reset?
A. A password reuse policy
B. Account lockout after three failed attempts
C. Encrypted credentials in transit
D. A geofencing policy based on login history
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 153
Which of the following would be the BEST method for creating a detailed diagram of wireless access points and
hot-spots?
A. Footprinting
B. White-box testing
C. A drone/UAV
D. Pivoting
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 154
A RAT that was used to compromise an organization's banking credentials was found on a user's computer.
The RAT evaded antivirus detection. It was installed by a user who has local administrator rights to the system
as part of a remote management tool set. Which of the following recommendations would BEST prevent this
from reoccurring?
A. Create a new acceptable use policy.
B. Segment the network into trusted and untrusted zones.
C. Enforce application whitelisting.
D. Implement DLP at the network boundary.
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 155
A security analyst is performing a forensic investigation of compromised account credentials. Using the Event
Viewer, the analyst able to detect the following message, ''Special privileges assigned to new login.'' Several of
these messages did not have a valid logon associated with the user before these privileges were assigned.
Which of the following attacks is MOST likely being detected?
A. Pass-the-hash
B. Buffer overflow
C. Cross-site scripting
D. Session replay
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 156
Phishing and spear-phishing attacks have been occurring more frequently against a company's staff. Which of
the following would MOST likely help mitigate this issue?
A. DNSSEC and DMARC
B. DNS query logging
C. Exact mail exchanger records in the DNS
D. The addition of DNS conditional forwarders
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 157
A security engineer needs to enhance MFA access to sensitive areas in a building. A key card and fingerprint
scan are already in use. Which of the following would add another factor of authentication?
A. Hard token
B. Retina scan
C. SMS text
D. Keypad PIN
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 158
An organization has implemented a policy requiring the use of conductive metal lockboxes for personal
electronic devices outside of a secure research lab. Which of the following did the organization determine to be
the GREATEST risk to intellectual property when creating this policy?
A. The theft of portable electronic devices
B. Geotagging in the metadata of images
C. Bluesnarfing of mobile devices
D. Data exfiltration over a mobile hotspot
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 159
A document that appears to be malicious has been discovered in an email that was sent to a company's Chief
Financial Officer (CFO). Which of the following would be BEST to allow a security analyst to gather information
and confirm it is a malicious document without executing any code it may contain?
A. Open the document on an air-gapped network
B. View the document's metadata for origin clues
C. Search for matching file hashes on malware websites
D. Detonate the document in an analysis sandbox
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 160
A malicious actor recently penetration tested a company's network and moved laterally to the datacenter. Upon
investigation, a forensics firm wants to know what was in the memory on the compromised server. Which of the
following files should be given to the forensics firm?
A. Security
B. Application
C. Dump
D. Syslog
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 161
The Chief Financial Officer (CFO) of an insurance company received an email from Ann, the company's Chief
Executive Officer (CEO), requesting a transfer of $10,000 to an account. The email states Ann is on vacation
and has lost her purse, containing cash and credit cards. Which of the following social-engineering techniques
is the attacker using?
A. Phishing
B. Whaling
C. Typo squatting
D. Pharming
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 162
A startup company is using multiple SaaS and IaaS platforms to stand up a corporate infrastructure and build
out a customer-facing web application. Which of the following solutions would be BEST to provide security,
manageability, and visibility into the platforms?
A. SIEM
B. DLP
C. CASB
D. SWG
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 163
A security assessment determines DES and 3DES at still being used on recently deployed production servers.
Which of the following did the assessment identify?
A. Unsecure protocols
B. Default settings
C. Open permissions
D. Weak encryption
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 164
A cybersecurity manager has scheduled biannual meetings with the IT team and department manager presents
a scenario and injects additional information throughout the session to replicate what might occur in a dynamic
cybersecurity event involving the company, its facilities, its data, and its staff. Which of the following describes
what the manager is doing?
A. Developing an incident response plan
B. Building a disaster recovery plan
C. Conducting a tabletop exercise
D. Running a simulation exercise
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 165
An organization is developing a plan in the event of a complete loss of critical systems and data. Which of the
following plans is the organization MOST likely developing?
A. Incident response
B. Communications
C. Disaster recovery
D. Data retention
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 166
Which of the following allows for functional test data to be used in new systems for testing and training
purposes to protect the data against reading?
A. Data encryption
B. Data masking
C. Data deduplication
D. Data minimization
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 167
Which of the following incident response steps involves actions to protect critical systems while maintaining
business operations?
A. Investigation
B. Containment
C. Recovery
D. Lessons learned
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 168
Given the following logs:
[DATA] attacking service ftp on port 21
[ATTEMPT] target 192.168.50.1 - login admin  pass password
[ATTEMPT] target 192.168.50.1 - login admin  pass access
[ATTEMPT] target 192.168.50.1 - login admin  pass allow
[ATTEMPT] target 192.168.50.1 - login admin  pass please
[ATTEMPT] target 192.168.50.1 - login admin  pass ftp
[ATTEMPT] target 192.168.50.1 - login admin  pass letmein
[21] [ftp] host: 192.168.50.1 loginLadmin password:letmein
1 of 1 target successfully completed, 1 valid password found
Which of the following BEST describes the type of attack that is occurring?
A. Rainbow table
B. Dictionary
C. Password spraying
D. Pass-the-hash
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 169
A company needs to centralize its logs to create a baseline and have visibility on its security events. Which of
the following technologies will accomplish this objective?
A. Security information and event management
B. A web application firewall
C. A vulnerability scanner
D. A net generation firewall
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 170
Some laptops recently went missing from a locked storage area that is protected by keyless, RFID-enabled
locks. There is no obvious damage to the physical space. The security manager identifies who unlocked the
door, however, human resources confirms this employee was on vacation at the time of the incident. Which of
the following describes what MOST likely occurred?
A. The employees physical access card was cloned.
B. The employee is colluding with human resources.
C. The employees biometrics were harvested.
D. A criminal used lock-picking tools to open the door.
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 171
An analyst has determined that a server was not patched and an external actor exfiltrated data on port 139.
Which of the following sources should the analyst review to BEST ascertain how the incident could have been
prevented?
A. The vulnerability scan output
B. The security logs
C. The baseline report
D. The correlation of events
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 172
A forensics examiner is attempting to dump passwords cached in the physical memory of a live system but
keeps receiving an error message. Which of the following BEST describes the cause of the error?
A. The examiner does not have administrative privileges to the system.
B. The system must be taken offline before a snapshot can be created.
C. Checksum mismatches are invalidating the disk image.
D. The swap file needs to be unlocked before it can be accessed.
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 173
The following is an administrative control which would be MOST effective to reduce the
occurrence of malware execution?
A. Security awareness training
B. Frequency of NIDS updates
C. Change control procedures
D. EDR reporting cycle
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 174
A security analyst needs to produce a document that details how a security incident
occurred, the steps that were taken for recovery, and how future incidents can be avoided.
During which of the following stages of the response process will this activity take place?
A. Recovery
B. Identification
C. Lesson learned
D. Preparation
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 175
A security analyst needs to implement an MDM solution for BYOD users that will allow the
company to retain control over company emails residing on the devices and limit data
exfiltration that might occur if the devices are lost or stolen. Which of the following would
BEST meet these requirements? (Select TWO).
A. Full-device encryption
B. Network usage rules
C. Geofencing
D. Containerization
E. Application whitelisting
F. Remote control
Correct Answer: AD


QUESTION 176
A nuclear plant was the victim of a recent attack, and all the networks were air gapped. A
subsequent investigation revealed a worm as the source of the issue. Which of the following
BEST explains what happened?
A. A malicious USB was introduced by an unsuspecting employee.
B. The ICS firmware was outdated
C. A local machine has a RAT installed.
D. The HVAC was connected to the maintenance vendor
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 177
A well-known organization has been experiencing attacks from APTs. The organization is
concerned that custom malware is being created and emailed into the company or installed
on USB sticks that are dropped in parking lots. Which of the following is the BEST defense
against this scenario?
A. Configuring signature-based antivirus io update every 30 minutes
B. Enforcing S/MIME for email and automatically encrypting USB drives upon insertion.
C. Implementing application execution in a sandbox for unknown software.
D. Fuzzing new files for vulnerabilities if they are not digitally signed
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 178
Local guidelines require that all information systems meet a minimum-security baseline to
be compliant. Which of the following can security administrators use to assess their system
configurations against the baseline?
A. SOAR playbook
B. Security control matrix
C. Risk management framework
D. Benchmarks
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 179
An organization has been experiencing outages during holiday sales and needs to ensure
availability of its point-of-sale systems The IT administrator has been asked to improve both
server data fault tolerance and site availability under high consumer load. Which of the
following are the BEST options to accomplish this objective'? (Select TWO)
A. Load balancing
B. Incremental backups
C. UPS
D. RAID
E. Dual power supply
F. NIC teaming
Correct Answer: AD


QUESTION 180
A security analyst needs to complete an assessment. The analyst is logged into a server
and must use native tools to map services running on it to the server's listening ports. Which
of the following tools can BEST accomplish this talk?
A. Netcat
B. Netstat
C. Nmap
D. Nessus
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 181
An organization's Chief Security Officer (CSO) wants to validate the business's involvement
in the incident response plan to ensure its validity and thoroughness. Which of the following
will the CSO MOST likely use?
A. An external security assessment
B. A bug bounty program
C. A tabletop exercise
D. A red-team engagement
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 182
A security analyst receives the configuration of a current VPN profile and notices the
authentication is only applied to the IP datagram portion of the packet. Which of the
following should the analyst implement to authenticate the entire packet?
A. AH
B. ESP
C. SRTP
D. LDAP
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 183
A network engineer needs to create a plan for upgrading the wireless infrastructure in a
large office. Priority must be given to areas that are currently experiencing latency and
connection issues. Which of the following would be the BEST resource for determining the
order of priority?
A. Nmap
B. Heat maps
C. Network diagrams
D. Wireshark
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 184
Employees are having issues accessing the company's website. Some employees report
very slow performance, while others cannot get to the website at all. The web and security
administrators search the logs and find millions of half-open connections to port 443 on the
web server. Further analysis reveals thousands of different source IPs initiating this traffic.
Which of the following attacks is MOST likely occurring?
A. DDoS
B. Man-in-the-middle
C. MAC flooding
D. Domain hijacking
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 185
A network engineer is troubleshooting wireless network connectivity issues that were
reported by users. The issues are occurring only in the section of the building that is closest
to the parking lot. Users are intermittently experiencing slow speeds when accessing
websites and are unable to connect to network drives. The issues appear to increase when
laptop users return to their desks after using their devices in other areas of the building.
There have also been reports of users being required to enter their credentials on web
pages in order to gain access to them. Which of the following is the MOST likely cause of
this issue?
A. An external access point is engaging in an evil-twin attack.
B. The signal on the WAP needs to be increased in that section of the building
C. The certificates have expired on the devices and need to be reinstalled
D. The users in that section of the building are on a VLAN that is being blocked by the
firewall.
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 186
A user recently attended an exposition and received some digital promotional materials The
user later noticed blue boxes popping up and disappearing on the computer, and reported
receiving several spam emails, which the user did not open. Which of the following is MOST
likely the cause of the reported issue?
A. There was a drive-by download of malware
B. The user installed a cryptominer
C. The OS was corrupted
D. There was malicious code on the USB drive
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 187
A Chief Information Security Officer (CISO) is concerned about the organization's ability to
continue business operation in the event of a prolonged DDoS attack on its local datacenter
that consumes database resources. Which of the following will the CISO MOST likely
recommend to mitigate this risk?
A. Upgrade the bandwidth available into the datacenter
B. Implement a hot-site failover location
C. Switch to a complete SaaS offering to customers
D. Implement a challenge response test on all end-user queries
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 188
An engineer wants to access sensitive data from a corporate-owned mobile device.
Personal data is not allowed on the device. Which of the following MDM configurations must
be considered when the engineer travels for business?
A. Screen locks
B. Application management
C. Geofencing
D. Containerization
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 189
A symmetric encryption algorithm Is BEST suited for:
A. key-exchange scalability.
B. protecting large amounts of data.
C. providing hashing capabilities,
D. implementing non-repudiation.
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 190
An organization routes all of its traffic through a VPN Most users are remote and connect
into a corporate datacenter that houses confidential information There is a firewall at the
Internet border followed by a DLP appliance, the VPN server and the datacenter itself.
Which of the following is the WEAKEST design element?
A. The DLP appliance should be integrated into a NGFW.
B. Split-tunnel connections can negatively impact the DLP appliance's performance
C. Encrypted VPN traffic will not be inspected when entering or leaving the network
D. Adding two hops in the VPN tunnel may slow down remote connections
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 191
An end user reports a computer has been acting slower than normal for a few weeks.
During an investigation, an analyst determines the system is sending the user's email
address and a ten-digit number to an IP address once a day. The only recent log entry
regarding the user's computer is the following:
Time: 06:32:29 UTC
Event Description: The file meets the ML algorithm's medium-confidence threshold.
Process Blocked: False
Operating System: Windows 10
File Name: \Device\HarddiskVolume4\Users\jdoe\AppData\Local\Microsoft\Windows
\NetCache\IE\pdftodocx.msi
Connection Details: 35.242.219.202:80
Which of the following is the MOST likely cause of the issue?
A. The end user purchased and installed a PUP from a web browser
B. A bot on the computer is brute forcing passwords against a website
C. A hacker is attempting to exfiltrate sensitive data
D. Ransomware is communicating with a command-and-control server.
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 192
A security analyst needs to determine how an attacker was able to use User3 to gain a
foothold within a company's network. The company's lockout policy requires that an account
be locked out for a minimum of 15 minutes after three unsuccessful attempts. While
reviewing the log files, the analyst discovers the following:
3/16/20 3:31:10 AM Audit Failure: CompanyNetwork\User1 Unknown username or bad
password.
3/16/20 3:31:11 AM Audit Failure: CompanyNetwork\User1 Unknown username or bad
password.
3/16/20 3:31:12 AM Audit Failure: CompanyNetwork\User1 Unknown username or bad
password.
3/16/20 3:31:13 AM Audit Failure: CompanyNetwork\User1 Account locked out..
3/16/20 3:31:14 AM Audit Failure: CompanyNetwork\User2 Unknown username or bad
password.
3/16/20 3:31:15 AM Audit Failure: CompanyNetwork\User2 Unknown username or bad
password.
3/16/20 3:31:16 AM Audit Failure: CompanyNetwork\User2 Unknown username or bad
password.
3/16/20 3:31:18 AM Audit Failure: CompanyNetwork\User2 Account locked out...
3/16/20 3:31:19 AM Audit Failure: CompanyNetwork\User3 Unknown username or bad
password.
3/16/20 3:31:20 AM Audit Failure: CompanyNetwork\User3 Unknown username or bad
password.
3/16/20 3:31:22 AM Audit Failure: CompanyNetwork\User3 Unknown username or bad
password.
3/16/20 3:31:22 AM Audit Success: CompanyNetwork\User3 Successful login.
3/16/20 3:31:10 AM Audit Failure: CompanyNetwork\User4 Unknown username or bad
password.
3/16/20 3:31:22 AM Audit Failure: CompanyNetwork\User4 Unknown username or bad
password.
3/16/20 3:32:40 AM Audit Failure: CompanyNetwork\User4 Unknown username or bad
password.
3/16/20 3:33:25 AM Audit Success: CompanyNetwork\User4 Successful login.
Which of the following attacks MOST likely occurred?
A. Dictionary
B. Credential-stuffing
C. Password-spraying
D. Brute-force
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 193
A security engineer needs to Implement the following requirements:
All Layer 2 switches should leverage Active Directory tor authentication.
All Layer 2 switches should use local fallback authentication If Active Directory Is offline.
All Layer 2 switches are not the same and are manufactured by several vendors.
Which of the following actions should the engineer take to meet these requirements?
(Select TWO).
A. Implement RADIUS.
B. Configure AAA on the switch with local login as secondary.
C. Configure port security on the switch with the secondary login method.
D. Implement TACACS+
E. Enable the local firewall on the Active Directory server.
F. Implement a DHCP server.
Correct Answer: AB


QUESTION 194
A company has determined that if its computer-based manufacturing is not functioning for
12 consecutive hours, it will lose more money than it costs to maintain the equipment.
Which of the following must be less than 12 hours to maintain a positive total cost of
ownership?
A. MTBF
B. RPO
C. RTO
D. MTTR
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 195
Which of the following would BEST identify and remediate a data-loss event in an enterprise
using third-party, web-based services and file-sharing platforms?
A. SIEM
B. CASB
C. UTM
D. DLP
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 196
The manager who is responsible for a data set has asked a security engineer to apply
encryption to the data on a hard disk. The security engineer is an example of a:
A. data controller.
B. data owner
C. data custodian.
D. data processor
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 197
A security analyst is reviewing logs on a server and observes the following output:
01/01/2020 03:33:23 admin attempted login with password sneak
01/01/2020 03:33:32 admin attempted login with password sneaked
01/01/2020 03:33:41 admin attempted login with password sneaker
01/01/2020 03:33:50 admin attempted login with password sneer
01/01/2020 03:33:59 admin attempted login with password sneeze
01/01/2020 03:34:08 admin attempted login with password sneezy
Which of the following is the security analyst observing?
A. A rainbow table attack
B. A password-spraying attack
C. A dictionary attack
D. A keylogger attack
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 198
A security analyst is reviewing information regarding recent vulnerabilities. Which of the
following will the analyst MOST likely consult to validate which platforms have been
affected?
A. OSINT
B. SIEM
C. CVSS
D. CVE
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 199
A small retail business has a local store and a newly established and growing online storefront. A recent storm
caused a power outage to the business and the local ISP, resulting in several hours of lost sales and delayed
order processing. The business owner now needs to ensure two things:
Protection from power outages
Always-available connectivity in case of an outage.
The owner has decided to implement battery backup for the computer equipment. Which of the following would
BEST fulfill the owner's second need?
A. Lease a telecommunications line to provide POTS for dial-up access
B. Connect the business router to its own dedicated UPS
C. Purchase services from a cloud provider for high availability
D. Replace the business's wired network with a wireless network
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 200
Which of the following scenarios would make a DNS sinkhole effective in thwarting an attack?
A. An attacker is sniffing traffic to port 53, and the server is managed using unencrypted usernames and
passwords.
B. An organization is experiencing excessive traffic on port 53 and suspects an attacker is trying to DoS the
domain name server.
C. Malware is trying to resolve an unregistered domain name to determine if it is running in an isolated
sandbox.
D. DNS routing tables have been compromised, and an attacker is rerouting traffic to malicious websites.
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 201
Which of the following would be BEST to establish between organizations that have agreed cooperate and are
engaged in early discussion to define the esponsibilities of each party, but do not want to establish a
contractually binding agreement?
A. A SLA
B. A NDA
C. A BPA
D. A MOU
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 202
A user is concerned that a web application will not be able to handle unexpected or random input without
crashing. Which of the following BEST describes the type of testing the user should perform?
A. Code signing
B. Fuzzing
C. Manual code review
D. Dynamic code analysis
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 203
A security analyst reviews the datacenter access logs for a fingerprint scanner and notices an abundance of
errors that correlate with users' reports of issues accessing the facility. Which of the following MOST likely the
cause of the cause of the access issues?
A. False rejection
B. Cross-over error rate
C. Efficacy rale
D. Attestation
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 204
Which of the following algorithms has the SMALLEST key size?
A. DES
B. Twofish
C. RSA
D. AES
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 205
When used at the design stage, which of the following improves the efficiency, accuracy, and speed of a
database?
A. Tokenization
B. Data masking
C. Normalization
D. Obfuscation
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 206
Which of the following disaster recovery tests is The LEAST time-consuming for the disaster recovery team?
A. Tabletop
B. Parallel
C. Full interruption
D. Simulation
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 207
A security analyst needs to make a recommendation for restricting access to certain segments of the network
using only data-link layer security. Which of the following controls will the analyst MOST likely recommend?
A. MAC
B. ACL
C. BPDU
D. ARP
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 208
An analyst needs to set up a method for securely transferring files between systems. One of the requirements
is to authenticate the IP header and the payload. Which of the following services would BEST meet the criteria?
A. TLS
B. PFS
C. ESP
D. AH
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 209
An incident response technician collected a mobile device during an investigation. Which of the following should
the technician do to maintain chain of custody?
A. Document the collection and require a sign-off when possession changes.
B. Lock the device in a safe or other secure location to prevent theft or alteration.
C. Place the device in a Faraday cage to prevent corruption of the data.
D. Record the collection in a blockchain-protected public ledger.
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 210
Which of the following organizational policies are MOST likely to detect fraud that is being conducted by
existing employees? (Select TWO).
A. Offboarding
B. Mandatory vacation
C. Job rotation
D. Background checks
E. Separation of duties
F. Acceptable use
Correct Answer: BC


QUESTION 211
A security manager for a retailer needs to reduce the scope of a project to comply with PCI DSS. The PCI data
is located in different offices than where credit cards are accepted. All the offices are connected via MPLS back
to the primary datacenter. Which of the following should the security manager implement to achieve the
objective?
A. Segmentation
B. Containment
C. Geofencing
D. Isolation
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 212
The facilities supervisor for a government agency is concerned about unauthorized access to environmental
systems in the event the staff WiFi network is breached. Which of the blowing would BEST address this
security concern?
A. install a smart meter on the staff WiFi.
B. Place the environmental systems in the same DHCP scope as the staff WiFi.
C. Implement Zigbee on the staff WiFi access points.
D. Segment the staff WiFi network from the environmental systems network.
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 213
Which of the following control sets should a well-written BCP include? (Select THREE)
A. Preventive
B. Detective
C. Deterrent
D. Corrective
E. Compensating
F. Physical
G. Recovery
Correct Answer: ADG


QUESTION 214
An enterprise has hired an outside security firm to conduct penetration testing on its network and applications.
The firm has only been given the documentation available to the customers of the applications. Which of the
following BEST represents the type of testing that will occur?
A. Bug bounty
B. Black-box
C. Gray-box
D. White-box
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 215
A Chief Executive Officer's (CEO) personal information was stolen in a social engineering attack. Which of the
following sources would reveal if the CEO's personal information is for sale?
A. Automated information sharing
B. Open-source intelligence
C. The dark web
D. Vulnerability databases
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 216
A security engineer needs to implement an MDM solution that complies with the corporate mobile device policy.
The policy states that in order for mobile users to access corporate resources on their devices the following
requirements must be met:
* Mobile device OSs must be patched up to the latest release
* A screen lock must be enabled (passcode or biometric)
* Corporate data must be removed if the device is reported lost or stolen
Which of the following controls should the security engineer configure? (Select TWO)
A. Containerization
B. Storage segmentation
C. Posturing
D. Remote wipe
E. Full-device encryption
F. Geofencing
Correct Answer: CD


QUESTION 217
A company is launching a new internet platform for its clients. The company does not want to implement its own
authorization solution but instead wants to rely on the authorization provided by another platform. Which of the
following is the BEST approach to implement the desired solution?
A. OAuth
B. TACACS+
C. SAML
D. RADIUS
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 218
Which of the following scenarios BEST describes a risk reduction technique?
A. A security control objective cannot be met through a technical change, so the company purchases
insurance and is no longer concerned about losses from data breaches.
B. A security control objective cannot be met through a technical change, so the company implements a policy
to train users on a more secure method of operation.
C. A security control objective cannot be met through a technical change, so the company changes as method
of operation
D. A security control objective cannot be met through a technical change, so the Chief Information Officer
(CIO) decides to sign off on the risk.
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 219
A cybersecurity department purchased o new PAM solution. The team is planning to randomize the service
account credentials of the Windows server first. Which of the following would be the BEST method to increase
the security on the Linux server?
A. Randomize the shared credentials
B. Use only guest accounts to connect.
C. Use SSH keys and remove generic passwords
D. Remove all user accounts.
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 220
A security administrator currently spends a large amount of time on common security tasks, such aa report
generation, phishing investigations, and user provisioning and deprovisioning This prevents the administrator
from spending time on other security projects. The business does not have the budget to add more staff
members. Which of the following should the administrator implement?
A. DAC
B. ABAC
C. SCAP
D. SOAR
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 221
Which of the following would be the BEST resource lor a software developer who is looking to improve secure
coding practices for web applications?
A. OWASP
B. Vulnerability scan results
C. NIST CSF
D. Third-party libraries
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 222
A network technician is installing a guest wireless network at a coffee shop. When a customer purchases an
Item, the password for the wireless network is printed on the recent so the customer can log in. Which of the
following will the technician MOST likely configure to provide the highest level of security with the least amount
of overhead?
A. WPA-EAP
B. WEP-TKIP
C. WPA-PSK
D. WPS-PIN
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 223
A company's Chief Information Security Officer (CISO) recently warned the security manager that the
company's Chief Executive Officer (CEO) is planning to publish a controversial opinion article in a national
newspaper, which may result in new cyberattacks Which of the following would be BEST for the security
manager to use in a threat model?
A. Hacktivists
B. White-hat hackers
C. Script kiddies
D. Insider threats
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 224
Which of the following are requirements that must be configured for PCI DSS compliance? (Select TWO).
A. Testing security systems and processes regularly
B. Installing and maintaining a web proxy to protect cardholder data
C. Assigning a unique ID to each person with computer access
D. Encrypting transmission of cardholder data across private networks
E. Benchmarking security awareness training for contractors
F. Using vendor-supplied default passwords for system passwords
Correct Answer: AD


QUESTION 225
An attacker has successfully exfiltrated several non-salted password hashes from an online
system. Given the logs below:
Which of the following BEST describes the type of password attack the attacker is
performing?
A. Dictionary
B. Pass-the-hash
C. Brute-force
D. Password-spaying
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 226
A security analyst needs to produce a document that details how a security incident occurred, the steps that
were taken for recovery, and how future incidents can be avoided. During which of the following stages of the
response process will this activity take place?
A. Recovery
B. Identification
C. Lessons learned
D. Preparation
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 227
A company is upgrading its wireless infrastructure to WPA2-Enterprise using EAP-TLS.
Which of the following must be part of the security architecture to achieve AAA? (Select
TWO)
A. DNSSEC
B. Reverse proxy
C. VPN concentrator
D. PKI
E. Active Directory
F. RADIUS
Correct Answer: DF


QUESTION 228
Some laptops recently went missing from a locked storage area that is protected by keyless
RFID-enabled locks. There is no obvious damage to the physical space. The security
manager identifies who unlocked the door, however, human resources confirms the
employee was on vacation at the time of the incident. Which of the following describes what
MOST likely occurred?
A. The employee's physical access card was cloned.
B. The employee is colluding with human resources
C. The employee's biometrics were harvested
D. A criminal used lock picking tools to open the door.
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 229
A company is designing the layout of a new datacenter so it will have an optimal environmental temperature
Which of the following must be included? (Select TWO)
A. An air gap
B. A cold aisle
C. Removable doors
D. A hot aisle
E. An loT thermostat
F. A humidity monitor
Correct Answer: EF


QUESTION 230
A security analyst is logged into a Windows file server and needs to see who is accessing files and from which
computers Which of the following tools should the analyst use?
A. netstat
B. net share
C. netcat
D. nbtstat
E. net session
Correct Answer: E


QUESTION 231
A security analyst is reviewing the output of a web server log and notices a particular account is attempting to
transfer large amounts of money:
Which of the following types of attack is MOST likely being conducted?
A. SQLi
B. CSRF
C. Session replay
D. API
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 232
Which of the following environments minimizes end-user disruption and is MOST likely to be used to assess the
impacts of any database migrations or major system changes by using the final version of the code?
A. Staging
B. Test
C. Production
D. Development
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 233
A security analyst is investigating an incident to determine what an attacker was able to do on a compromised
laptop. The analyst reviews the following SIEM log:
Which of the following describes the method that was used to compromise the laptop?
A. An attacker was able to move laterally from PC1 to PC2 using a pass-the-hash attack
B. An attacker was able to bypass application whitelisting by emailing a spreadsheet attachment with an
embedded PowerShell in the file
C. An attacker was able to install malware to the CAasdf234 folder and use it to gain administrator nights and
launch Outlook
D. An attacker was able to phish user credentials successfully from an Outlook user profile
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 234
An information security incident recently occurred at an organization, and the organization was required to
report the incident to authorities and notify the affected parties. When the organization's customers became of
aware of the incident, some reduced their orders or stopped placing orders entirely. Which of the following is
the organization experiencing?
A. Reputation damage
B. Identity theft
C. Anonymization
D. Interrupted supply chain
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 235
An attacker is attempting to exploit users by creating a fake website with the URL users. Which of the following
social-engineering attacks does this describe?
A. Information elicitation
B. Typo squatting
C. Impersonation
D. Watering-hole attack
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 236
Users at organization have been installing programs from the internet on their workstations without first proper
authorization. The organization maintains a portal from which users can install standardized programs.
However, some users have administrative access on their workstations to enable legacy programs to function
properly. Which of the following should the security administrator consider implementing to address this issue?
A. Application code signing
B. Application whitelisting
C. Data loss prevention
D. Web application firewalls
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 237
A company has decided to move its operations to the cloud. It wants to utilize technology that will prevent users
from downloading company applications for personal use, restrict data that is uploaded, and have visibility into
which applications are being used across the company. Which of the following solutions will BEST meet these
requirements?
A. A NGFW
B. A CASB
C. Application whitelisting
D. A NG-SWG
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 238
The Chief Executive Officer (CEO) of an organization would like staff members to have the flexibility to work
from home anytime during business hours, including during a pandemic or crisis. However, the CEO is
concerned that that some staff members may take advantage of the flexibility and work from high-risk countries
while on holiday or outsource work to a third-party organization in another country. The Chief Information
Officer (CIO) believes the company can implement some basic controls to mitigate the majority of the risk.
Which of the following would be BEST to mitigate the CEOs concerns? (Select TWO).
A. Geolocation
B. Time-of-day restrictions
C. Certificates
D. Tokens
E. Geotagging
F. Role-based access controls
Correct Answer: AB


QUESTION 239
A large industrial systems smart generator monitors the system status and sends alerts to third-party
maintenance personnel when critical failures occur. While reviewing the network logs, the companys security
manager notices the generators IP is sending packets to an internal file servers IP.
Which of the following mitigations would be BEST for the security manager to implement while maintaining
alerting capabilities?
A. Segmentation
B. Firewall whitelisting
C. Containment
D. Isolation
Correct Answer: A


QUESTION 240
A client sent several inquiries to a project manager about the delinquent delivery status of some critical reports.
 The project manager claimed the reports were previously sent via email, but then quickly generated and
backdated the reports before submitting them via a new email message.
Which of the following actions MOST likely supports an investigation for fraudulent submission?
A. Establish chain of custody.
B. Inspect the file metadata.
C. Reference the data retention policy.
D. Review the email event logs.
Correct Answer: B


QUESTION 241
Following a prolonged datacenter outage that affected web-based sales, a company has decided to move its
operations to a private cloud solution. The security team has received the following requirements:
There must be visibility into how teams are using cloud-based services.
The company must be able to identify when data related to payment cards is being sent to the cloud.
Data must be available regardless of the end users geographic location.
Administrators need a single pane-of-glass view into traffic and trends.
Which of the following should the security analyst recommend?
A. Create firewall rules to restrict traffic to the outer cloud services providers.
B. Install a DLP solution to monitor data in transit.
C. Implement a CASB solution.
D. Configure a web-based filter.
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 242
A financial organization has adopted a new secure, encrypted document-sharing application to help with its
customer loan process. Some important PII needs to be shared across this new platform, but it is getting
blocked by the DLP systems. Which of the following actions will BEST allow the PII to be shared with the
secure application without compromising the organizations security posture?
A. Configure the DLP policies to allow all PII.
B. Configure the firewall to allow all ports that are used by this application.
C. Configure the antivirus software to allow the application.
D. Configure the DLP policies to whitelist this application with the specific PII.
E. Configure the application to encrypt the PII.
Correct Answer: D


QUESTION 243
A cybersecurity manager has scheduled biannual meetings with the IT team and department leaders to discuss
how they would respond to hypothetical cyberattacks. During these meetings, the manager presents a scenario
and injects additional information throughout the session to replicate what might occur in a dynamic
cybersecurity event involving the company, its facilities, its data, and its staff. Which of the following describes
what the manager is doing?
A. Developing an incident response plan
B. Building a disaster recovery plan
C. Conducting a tabletop exercise
D. Running a simulation exercise
Correct Answer: C


QUESTION 244
An attacker is trying to gain access by installing malware on a website that is known to be visited by the target
victims. Which of the following is the attacker MOST likely attempting?
A. A spear-phishing attack
B. A watering-hole attack
C. Type squatting
D. A phishing attack
Correct Answer: B

